Rhode Island statutes. Constitution of the State of Rhode Island
Article VII Of the House of Representatives

§ 1. Composition.

There shall be one hundred members of the house of representatives, provided, however, that commencing in 2003 there shall be seventy-five members of the house of representatives. The house of representatives shall be constituted on the basis of population and the representative districts shall be as nearly equal in population and as compact in territory as possible. The general assembly shall, after any new census taken by authority of the United States, reapportion the representation to conform to the Constitution of the state and the Constitution of the United States.

History of Section.

Proposed amendments to Article VII, Section 1 of the R.I. Constitution by Joint Resolutions 184 and 193 of 1994 were approved by a majority of the electorate voting in a statewide election on November 8, 1994.

§ 2. Officers — Presiding member during organization.

The house of representatives shall have authority to elect its speaker, clerks, and other officers. The senior member from the City of Newport, if any be present, shall preside in the organization of the house.